output.aff
# verzia 0.5.5
SET UTF-8 
#Male pismena sa zotriedene podla pravdepodobnosti vyskytu v slovencine
TRY eonairvtlmpukszdjhcbygfxwqAEIOUYBCDLMNFJKPRSTVGHQWXZ

PFX N Y 1
PFX N   0           ne         .

PFX F Y 1
PFX F   0           naj        .

SFX z Y 5
SFX z   a           y          a
SFX z   a           e          [^euo]a
SFX z   a           i          [euo]a
SFX z   a           u          a
SFX z   a           ou         a

SFX Z Y 157
SFX Z   a           i          [euo]a
SFX Z   ka          k          [^aeiouyo].oka
SFX Z   ta          t          orta
SFX Z   va          v          [^aeiouyo].ova
SFX Z   la          l          iela
SFX Z   a           0          [aeiouryo].a
SFX Z   a           0          auka
SFX Z   a           0          [i][aeu][^dnl]a
SFX Z   a           0          yena
SFX Z   a           0          ie.[^kd]a
SFX Z   a           0          [aeiouyo][^hzz][^kbe]a
SFX Z   a           0          r...[^kl]a
SFX Z   a           0          i[eua].[ayou][bdv]a
SFX Z   a           0          [aeiouyro].[eiayuol].a
SFX Z   a           0          ia[tc]ina
SFX Z   a           0          azda
SFX Z   a           0          [aeiouyo][^aeiouyo]cina
SFX Z   a           0          [^so].ola
SFX Z   a           0          [aeiouyo][hknssvz][artd][auio][dtnb]a
SFX Z   a           0          ie[hnprsv][cnrt][aie][dnlv]a
SFX Z   a           0          alanda
SFX Z   a           0          [ulac][seamu][fptv]ora
SFX Z   a           0          tvora
SFX Z   a           0          [aeiouy][^aeiouyp][^iln]ava
SFX Z   a           0          iemota
SFX Z   a           0          [ya]straha
SFX Z   a           0          avlaha
SFX Z   a           0          [^e][^g]enda
SFX Z   ra          er         [uy]hra
SFX Z   va          ev         [uy][zz]va
SFX Z   aba         ab         laba
SFX Z   ala         al         iala
SFX Z   aha         ah         [^aeiouyv][^ir]aha
SFX Z   ata         at         [^aeiouy].[^is]ata
SFX Z   ava         av         [^aeiouy][^aeiouyrp][^iln]ava
SFX Z   ada         ad         [^i][aeiouy].ada
SFX Z   ada         ad         [iom][bhz]rada
SFX Z   ada         ad         a[mh][bn]ada
SFX Z   ica         ic         ivica
SFX Z   ba          ob         ia.ba
SFX Z   ba          ob         [aeiouyo].ba
SFX Z   ata         iat        sata
SFX Z   oba         ob         [^rzeeiayuoo][^j]oba
SFX Z   ota         ot         [^ieiayuoorl][^eiayuoo][^d]ota
SFX Z   oda         od         [^eiayuoorl].oda
SFX Z   oha         oh         [^aeiouy]loha
SFX Z   ola         ol         skola
SFX Z   ola         ol         odola
SFX Z   ora         or         [hkm]ora
SFX Z   ora         or         [od]pora
SFX Z   ka          ok         [^f]i[ea].ka
SFX Z   ka          ok         [aeiouyor][^u]ka
SFX Z   ka          ok         [aieo]jka
SFX Z   ka          ok         [aeiouyor]stka
SFX Z   ka          ok         i[eau]stka
SFX Z   ka          ok         ientka
SFX Z   ka          iek        iantka
SFX Z   ka          ok         adzka
SFX Z   ata         iat        ata
SFX Z   aba         iab        zaba
SFX Z   ba          ieb        [^t][rns]ba
SFX Z   ba          ieb        [^i].tba
SFX Z   ba          ieb        [^u][vzz]ba
SFX Z   eda         ied        [^i]eda
SFX Z   eba         ieb        [^i]eba
SFX Z   ra          ier        [hd]ra
SFX Z   va          iev        [kstzz]va
SFX Z   va          iev        arva
SFX Z   lva         liev       lva
SFX Z   lba         lieb       [aeo]lba
SFX Z   ilba        ilb        ilba
SFX Z   dba         dieb       [auo]dba
SFX Z   dka         diek       [^i][^eioouy]dka
SFX Z   nka         niek       [^i][^eioouy]nka
SFX Z   tka         tiek       [^i][^eioouy]tka
SFX Z   arta        art        arta
SFX Z   ka          iek        [^i][lr][fdccs]ka
SFX Z   ka          iek        [^i][aeiuy][bccdfghklmoprsstvzz]ka
SFX Z   ka          iek        [^i][aeuiy][sn]tka
SFX Z   ka          iek        o[bccdfghklmnoprsstvzz]ka
SFX Z   ka          iek        [lr]nka
SFX Z   ka          iek        [^i][eiuy]nka
SFX Z   ka          iek        [^ib]anka
SFX Z   lka         liek       [^i][aeouy]lka
SFX Z   eta         iet        [^p][^o][^iu]eta
SFX Z   alva        alv        alva
SFX Z   rva         rv         [bmt]rva
SFX Z   rba         rb         trba
SFX Z   aba         ab         baba
SFX Z   iba         ib         iba
SFX Z   uda         ud         uda
SFX Z   iha         ih         iha
SFX Z   ika         ik         [^eiayuoo].ika
SFX Z   ila         il         [^a]ila
SFX Z   ita         it         [^i][aeiouy].ita
SFX Z   ina         in         [^i][aaeiouy].ina
SFX Z   ina         in         [^i][aoley][bhjlnrtv]cina
SFX Z   ina         in         [^a][bccdhrkjrnddtvzz][clmnpsrvz]ina
SFX Z   elta        ielt       [^i]elta
SFX Z   ela         iel        [^dilnrtu]ela
SFX Z   esta        iest       [^d][^i]esta
SFX Z   enda        iend       egenda
SFX Z   ena         ien        [^mty]ena
SFX Z   ena         ien        [^eiayuoo]mena
SFX Z   ma          iem        [^i]erma
SFX Z   anda        and        [^a].anda
SFX Z   arda        ard        arda
SFX Z   amba        amb        amba
SFX Z   imba        imb        imba
SFX Z   omba        omb        [^l]omba
SFX Z   umba        umb        umba
SFX Z   unda        und        unda
SFX Z   rnda        rnd        rnda
SFX Z   avda        avd        avda
SFX Z   azda        azd        azda
SFX Z   abzda       abzd       abzda
SFX Z   azda        azd        azda
SFX Z   auna        aun        auna
SFX Z   uka         uk         [^eiayuoo][^a]uka
SFX Z   una         un         [dklr]una
SFX Z   ula         ul         [^a]ula
SFX Z   yba         yb         [^e][hr]yba
SFX Z   anka        ank        [^d]banka
SFX Z   ucha        uch        ucha
SFX Z   0           m          [aeioruyo].a
SFX Z   0           m          i[aeu].a
SFX Z   0           m          [aeioruyo][dps][ctz][hk]a
SFX Z   0           m          acha
SFX Z   0           m          i[eau][bccdllnmprssttvzz][bdghkt]a
SFX Z   0           m          i[eau][sn]tka
SFX Z   0           m          [aeiolruyo][bccddfghjkllmnprssttvzz][bccddfghjkllmnprsstvzz]a
SFX Z   a           am         [euo]a
SFX Z   a           am         [^i][aeiyoua].a
SFX Z   a           am         iola
SFX Z   a           am         io[nrstv]ka
SFX Z   a           am         amlka
SFX Z   a           am         [aeuoiya][brs][ckrt][hmn]a
SFX Z   a           am         [bcdfkmprsstv][klrstv][ccknrstvzz][bdhkmntv]a
SFX Z   a           am         [^i][aeuoiya][bccddfghjkllmnprssttvxzz][bccddfghjkllmnnprsstvxzz]a
SFX Z   a           am         [^it][aeuoiya][bccddfghjkllmnprsstvxzz][bccddfghjkllmnprsstvxzz][bccddfghjkllmnprsstvxzz]a
SFX Z   0           ch         [aeioruyo].a
SFX Z   0           ch         i[aeu].a
SFX Z   0           ch         [aeioruyo][dps][ctz][hk]a
SFX Z   0           ch         acha
SFX Z   0           ch         i[eau][bccdllnmprssttvzz][bdghkt]a
SFX Z   0           ch         i[eau][sn]tka
SFX Z   0           ch         [aeiolruyo][bccddfghjkllmnprssttvzz][bccddfghjkllmnprsstvzz]a
SFX Z   a           ach        [euo]a
SFX Z   a           ach        [^i][aeiyoua].a
SFX Z   a           ach        iola
SFX Z   a           ach        io[nrstv]ka
SFX Z   a           ach        amlka
SFX Z   a           ach        [aeuoiya][brs][ckrt][hmn]a
SFX Z   a           ach        [bcdfkmprsstv][klrstv][ccknrstvzz][bdhkmntv]a
SFX Z   a           ach        [^i][aeuoiya][bccddfghjkllmnprssttvxzz][bccddfghjkllmnnprsstvxzz]a
SFX Z   a           ach        [^it][aeuoiya][bccddfghjkllmnprsstvxzz][bccddfghjkllmnprsstvxzz][bccddfghjkllmnprsstvxzz]a
SFX Z   a           ami        a
