output.dic
alfa/Zz
alkoholicka/Zz
Ankara/z
anuita/Zz
artikulacny/NY
astma/Zz
audiokazeta/Zz
babocka/Zz
baletka/Zz
balistickejsi/FP
bdelejsi/FI
behacka/Zz
bezpecnejsi/FP
bezsenny/NY
beznejsi/FP
biochemicka/Zz
blizsi/FP
bokombriadka/Zz
brezicka/Zz
buchotat/NT
bunda/Zz
cena/Zz
cennejsi/FP
cirkusantka/Zz
capta/Zz
cernasty/NY
ciernovlaska/Zz
cistejsi/FI
databaza/Zz
dedincanka/Zz
denglavy/NY
detailnejsi/FP
deviatka/Zz
didaktika/Zz
divotvornejsi/FP
dlapa/Zz
dlhsi/FP
dohoda/Zz
dohotovit/EN
doryt/NX
doveryhodnejsi/FP
dracka/Zz
drevovina/Zz
drkotavy/NY
drobnejsi/FP
duplicita/Zz
dvojbodka/Zz
efektivnejsi/FP
ekologickejsi/FP
elektromechanicka/Zz
elita/Zz
energetickejsi/FP
erdzat/NR
estetickejsi/FP
etapa/Zz
Etna/z
fantastickejsi/FI
fantastka/Zz
fara/Zz
fascinujucejsi/FP
financnicka/Zz
finta/Zz
francuzstinarka/Zz
frankovka/Zz
frekventovanejsi/FP
fundamentalisticky/NY
Gambijcanka/Zz
gangrena/Zz
gladiola/Zz
glajcha/Zz
guma/Zz
gumka/Zz
hatlanina/Zz
Hercegovina/Zz
hladko/FP
hlasno/FP
hlboky/NY
hlbsi/FP
hmatatelne/FP
hodvabnejsi/FP
holandcina/z
ho/N
horsi/FP
horucava/Zz
hrozievat/NX
hrozostrasnejsi/FI
hungaristika/Zz
hustejsi/FP
hydrocentrala/Zz
chrasta/Zz
chudobnejsi/FP
chvatnut/NW
ikernacka/Zz
informativnejsi/FP
invalidnejsi/FP
Irma/Zz
jagavejsi/FP
jama/Zz
jasnozrivy/NY
jednotlivina/Zz
jemne/FP
kacabajka/Zz
kanistra/Zz
Karolina/Zz
kaverna/Zz
kibicovat/NW
klonka/Zz
kofa/Zz
konfrontovat/NW
kontura/Zz
korka/Zz
krajinomalba/Zz
krajsi/FP
kridlaty/NY
kridlovka/Zz
kruto/FP
kukla/Zz
kuricka/Zz
lacny/NY
lahsi/FP
lajdacka/Zz
lampicka/Zz
letovacka/Zz
lieska/Zz
listovat/NW
Ludmila/Zz
Lujza/Zz
majestatne/FP
malinocka/Zz
malorolnicka/Zz
mapovat/NW
mastnota/Zz
maskrta/Zz
metafora/Zz
metoda/Zz
mierumilovnejsi/FP
mizina/Zz
mladicky/NY
mnozina/Zz
modernejsi/FP
motorika/Zz
mrtvola/Zz
muzsky/NY
nadcha/z
nahle/FP
nahlit/NX
naivka/Zz
naostrit/EN
napato/FP
nastrihavat/NX
nausnicka/Zz
nechapavo/FP
nepatrny/NY
neplecha/Zz
neskor/F
neuvazene/FP
noeticka/Zz
novsi/FP
nuansa/Zz
obhajeny/NY
oblubenejsi/FP
obnova/Zz
obstarny/NY
ocistenejsi/FP
odhrabavat/NX
odmena/Zz
odpilit/NX
odtucnovat/NW
okarina/Zz
okazalejsi/FP
okorenit/EN
opatrovnicka/Zz
opluvat/NX
orodovnicka/Zz
ostychat/NX
osudovejsi/FP
otazka/Zz
ovocnejsi/FP
ozit/NW
palacinka/Zz
paprika/Zz
paska/Zz
paveza/Zz
perina/Zz
piatacky/NY
pikolka/Zz
pivotka/Zz
pletenina/Zz
plno/FP
pocastovat/NW
podenka/Zz
podriapat/NT
podstatnejsi/FP
podustva/Zz
pokladnicky/NY
pokora/z
pokrutenejsi/FNP
polovnicka/Zz
pomerny/NY
ponozka/Zz
poprivazovat/NW
postenavat/NX
potuchlina/Zz
poupratovat/NW
pouzitelnejsi/FP
pozatlacat/NX
poznamka/Zz
pravdepodobne/FP
prebrusovat/NW
predplodina/Zz
prefiltrovat/NW
prehanka/Zz
prekvapene/FP
premeriavat/NX
preskocit/EN
prevrhnut/NW
prezyvka/Zz
priaznivejsich/FP
priehyba/Zz
priklepnut/NW
primitivnejsi/FP
prisluhovacsky/NY
pritazlivejsi/FP
priucka/Zz
prognoza/Zz
prostredny/NY
pumpa/Zz
puska/Zz
rapotat/NT
raznejsi/FP
rebrina/Zz
recnovanka/Zz
rezky/NY
ribonukleaza/Zz
riesitelka/Zz
rozdurit/EN
rozmienat/NX
roznobezka/Zz
roznozka/Zz
rozpustny/NY
rozsiahlejsi/FP
rozvirovat/NW
rychlejsi/FP
ryska/Zz
rytina/Zz
samulinky/NY
sebakontrola/Zz
sedemdesiatnicka/Zz
sexuologicka/Zz
schnapnut/NW
schranka/Zz
skor/FN
skornatiet/NX
skratenina/Zz
skvelejsi/FP
skyva/Zz
slavnejsi/FP
slubit/NX
slucha/Zz
smotana/Zz
spajka/Zz
spievkat/NX
spisba/Zz
spravnejsi/FP
spriadacka/Zz
spriemyselnovat/NW
starousadlicka/Zz
stihnut/NW
stotina/Zz
strasnejsi/FP
strieska/Zz
strucny/NY
sucasnicka/Zz
surfistka/Zz
svedecky/NY
svinka/Zz
sachistka/Zz
sestina/Zz
sestmocny/NY
skala/Zz
skripavo/FP
skvrnka/Zz
sofersky/NY
spageta/Zz
stava/Zz
stvorako/NY
stvorstovka/Zz
stylizujucejsi/FP
svedcina/z
tambura/Zz
tazba/Zz
tazko/NY
terkelicka/Zz
Tirana/z
tlmocnicky/NY
tonina/Zz
traskavina/Zz
trojclenny/NY
trojkarka/Zz
tucnejsi/FP
uceny/NY
udatnejsieho/FP
uhlokresba/Zz
ulita/Zz
upravenejsi/FP
usidlit/NX
uzda/Zz
vacsi/FP
vdacnejsi/FP
vdovsky/NY
vernovka/Zz
vesticka/Zz
vhodnejsi/FP
viskozita/Zz
vpit/NW
vrazda/Zz
vrhacka/Zz
vseobecnejsi/FP
vyhodnejsi/FP
vychladzat/NX
vynimka/Zz
vypracovany/NY
vysokopostavenejsi/FP
vytvoreny/NY
vyvesenejsi/FP
vzdialenejsi/FP
vzduchotechnika/Zz
Washingtoncanka/Zz
zadubeny/NY
zamiesit/NX
zastrelit/EN
zaujimavejsi/FP
zdobit/EN
zemianka/Zz
zhanacka/Zz
zjasenejsi/FP
zlomyselnejsi/FP
zlovolnejsi/FP
zmilitarizovat/NW
zmyselnejsi/FP
zrepetit/EN
zrozumitelnejsi/FI
zerucha/Zz
zivsi/FP
zlcovity/NY
